hu: Nyíl/csavar anyaga: Alumínium; Bambusz; Szénszálas; Szénszál-erősítésű polimer (CFRP); Üveggyapot; Fa; Egyéb
en: Arrow/Bolt material: Aluminum; Bamboo; Carbon fiber; Carbon fiber reinforced polymer (CFRP); Fiberglass; Wood; Other
cs: Materiál šípu/šroubu: Hliník; Bambus; Uhlíkové vlákno; Polymer vyztužený uhlíkovými vlákny (CFRP); Skelná vata; Dřevo; Jiné
th: วัสดุสำหรับลูกธนู/โบลต์: อะลูมิเนียม; ไผ่; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; โพลิเมอร์เสริมเส้นใยคาร์บอน (CFRP); ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ไม้; อื่นๆ
tr: Ok/Cıvata malzemesi: Alüminyum; Bambu; Karbon fiber; Karbon fiber takviyeli polimer (CFRP); Fiberglas; Ahşap; Diğer
nl: Pijl/boutmateriaal: Aluminium; Bamboe; Koolstofvezel; Koolstofvezelversterkt polymeer (CFRP); Glasvezel; Hout; Andere
pt-BR: Material de flecha/virote: Alumínio; Bambu; Fibra de carbono; Polímero reforçado com fibra de carbono (CFRP); Fibra de vidro; Madeira; Outro
ko: 화살/볼트 재질: 알루미늄; 대나무; 탄소 섬유; 탄소 섬유 강화 폴리머(CFRP); 유리 섬유; 목재; 기타
bg-BG: Материал на стрелите: Алуминий; Бамбук; Въглеродни влакна; Полимер, подсилен с въглеродни влакна (CFRP); Fiberglass; Дърво; Други
pt-PT: Material de seta/parafuso: Alumínio; Bambu; Fibra de carbono; Polímero reforçado com fibra de carbono (CFRP); Fibra de vidro; Madeira; Outro
sv: Pil/skäkta - material: Aluminium; Bambu; Kolfiber; Kolfiberförstärkt polymer (CFRP); Glasfiber; Trä; Övrigt
lt-LT: Lanko / arbaleto strėlės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Bambukas; Anglies pluoštas; Anglies pluoštu armuotas polimeras (CFRP); Stiklo pluoštas; Mediena; Kita
zh-CN: 箭头/螺栓材质: 铝; 竹子; 碳纤维; 碳纤维增强聚合物 (CFRP); 玻璃纤维; 木头; 其他
pl: Materiał strzały/bełtu: Aluminium; Bambus; Włókno węglowe; Polimer wzmocniony włóknem węglowym (CFRP); Włókno szklane; Drewno; Inne
vi: Vật liệu mũi tên/bu lông: Nhôm; Tre; Sợi carbon; Polyme gia cố sợi carbon (CFRP); Sợi thủy tinh; Gỗ; Khác
fi: Nuolen/varsijousinuolen materiaali: Alumiini; Bambu; Hiilikuitu; Hiilikuituvahvistettu polymeeri (CFRP); Lasikuitu; Puu; Muu
it: Materiale freccia/bullone: Alluminio; Bamboo; Fibra di carbonio; Polimero rinforzato con fibra di carbonio (CFRP); Vetroresina; Legno; Altro
el: Υλικό βέλους: Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Ανθρακόνημα; Πολυμερές ενισχυμένο με ίνες άνθρακα (CFRP); Υαλοβάμβακας; Ξύλο; Άλλο
de: Pfeil-/Bolzenmaterial: Aluminium; Bambus; Kohlenstofffaser; Kohlenstofffaserverstärkter Kunststoff (CFRP); Fiberglas; Holz; Sonstiges
ru: Материал стрел для лука или арбалета: Алюминий; Бамбук; Углеродное волокно; Полимер, армированный углеродным волокном (CFRP); Стеклопластик; Дерево; Другое
ro-RO: Material săgeată/proiectil: Aluminiu; Bamboo; Fibră de carbon; Polimer armat cu fibră de carbon (CFRP); Fibră de sticlă; Lemn; Altele
sl-SI: Material puščic/puščic za samostrel: Aluminij; Bambus; Ogljikova vlakna; Polimer, ojačan z ogljikovimi vlakni (CFRP); Steklena vlakna; Les; Drugo
da: Pil/bolt-materiale: Aluminum; Bambus; Kulfiber; Kulfiberforstærket polymer (CFRP); Glasfiber; Træ; Andet
sk-SK: Materiál šípov: Hliník; Bambus; Uhlíkové vlákno; Polymér vystužený uhlíkovými vláknami (CFRP); Sklolaminát; Drevo; Iné
zh-TW: 箭頭/螺栓材料: 鋁; 竹子; 碳纖維; 碳纖維增強聚合物 (CFRP); 玻璃纖維; 木材; 其他
nb: Pil-/boltmateriale: Aluminium; Bambus; Karbonfiber; Karbonfiberforsterket polymer (CFRP); Glassfiber; Trevirke; Annet
ja: 矢印/ボルト材料: アルミニウム; バンブー; カーボンファイバー; 炭素繊維強化プラスチック (CFRP); ガラス繊維; 木材; その他
es: Material de flecha/perno: Aluminio; Bambú; Fibra de carbono; Polímero reforzado con fibra de carbono (CFRP); Fibra de vidrio; Madera; Otros
fr: Matériau de la flèche/du boulon: Aluminum; Bambou; Fibre de carbone; Polymère renforcé de fibres de carbone (CFRP); Fibre de verre; Bois; Autre
hr-HR: Materijal od kojeg je izrađena strijela / strijela za samostrel: Aluminij; Bambus; Karbonska vlakna; Polimer ojačan karbonskim vlaknima (CFRP); Stakloplastika; Drvo; Ostalo